Georgia, session 2025_26, HB565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
income tax imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits, is amended in Code
Section 48-7-29.21, relating to tax credits for donations to nonprofit corporations awarding
grants to public schools, by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (f) as follows:
"(f)(1) In no event shall the aggregate amount of tax credits allowed under this Code
section exceed: $25 million per calendar year
(A) $5 million for the tax year ending on December 31, 2023; or
(B) $15 million for the tax year 2024, and for all subsequent tax years."
H. B. 565
- 1 -

LC 50 1151
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 565
- 2 -